District of Columbia statutes.
44-786

Repealed

Fees for clinical services; free services.

Repealed.

July 9, 1946, 60 Stat. 511, ch. 544, § 1
June 15, 1977, D.C. Law 2-9, § 2, 24 DCR 1215
Sept. 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-24, § 4, 24 DCR 3343
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-79, § 505, 29 DCR 126
Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101,§§ 2001, 2101(a) (12), 29 DCR 1060
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 502, 30 DCR 2632
Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-173, § 6, 32 DCR 736
1973 Ed., § 32-322.
1981 Ed., § 32-119.